Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-504
Misappropriation; damages.

Except to the extent that a material and prejudicial change of position prior to acquiring knowledge or having reason to know of the misappropriation renders a monetary recovery inequitable, a complainant shall be entitled to recover damages for misappropriation. Damages may include both the actual loss caused by misappropriation and the unjust enrichment caused by misappropriation that is not taken into account in computing actual loss. In lieu of damages measured by any other methods, the damages caused by misappropriation may be measured by imposition of liability for a reasonable royalty for a misappropriator's unauthorized disclosure or use of a trade secret.

Laws 1988, LB 337A, § 4.